Maryland, session 2026, HB0496.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
3–202.
(a) (4) In the section of the statewide voter registration application that asks
the voter whether the voter wants to affiliate with a political party, the application shall
list the recognized political parties in the State and include the following statement: “You
must register with a political party if you want to take part in that political party’s [primary
election,] caucus[,] or convention. Check one box only.”.
3–203.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0496*

HOUSE BILL 496
(c) An automatic voter registration system:
(1) may not require any information that duplicates the information
required to complete an applicable transaction;
(2) shall require only the minimum amount of information necessary for
both an applicable transaction and a voter registration to:
(i) prevent duplicate voter registration; and
(ii) enable election officials to review the eligibility of an applicant
and to administer voter registration and other aspects of the election process; and
(3) shall inform an applicant that if the applicant does not select a political
party affiliation, the individual will be designated as not affiliated with a political party
[and will be unable to vote in a party primary election].
8–202.
(a) A principal political party, as determined by the statement of registration
issued by the State Board:
(1) shall use the primary election to:
(i) nominate its candidates for public office; and
(ii) elect all members of the local central committees of the political
party; and
(2) may use the primary election in the year of a presidential election to
elect delegates to a national presidential nominating convention.
(b) Except for a nominee for President or Vice President, the name of a nominee
of a principal political party may not appear on the ballot in a general election if the
individual has not:
(1) been nominated in the primary election; or
(2) been designated to fill a vacancy in nomination in accordance with Title
5 of this article.
(c) If a political party chooses to permit voters [not] affiliated with [the] A
DIFFERENT POLITICAL party to vote in the POLITICAL party’s primary election, the
chairman of the POLITICAL party’s State central committee shall so notify the State Board
at least 6 months before the date of the primary election.

HOUSE BILL 496 3
(D) (1) IN A PRIMARY ELECTION, A VOTER WHO IS NOT AFFILIATED WITH
A POLITICAL PARTY MAY VOTE:
(I) THE BALLOT FOR UNAFFILIATED VOTERS, IF THERE IS A
BALLOT FOR UNAFFILIATED VOTERS IN THE COUNTY FOR THE PRIMARY ELECTION;
OR
(II) THE BALLOT OF THE POLITICAL PARTY OF THE VOTER’S
CHOICE.
(2) A VOTER WHO IS NOT AFFILIATED WITH A POLITICAL PARTY WHO
VOTES THE BALLOT OF A POLITICAL PARTY IN A PRIMARY ELECTION UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT AUTOMATICALLY BECOME
AFFILIATED WITH THE POLITICAL PARTY WHOSE BALLOT THE VOTER VOTED.
(3) AN UNAFFILIATED VOTER MAY NOT VOTE MORE THAN ONE
BALLOT IN A PRIMARY ELECTION.
9–305.
(a) A voter may request an absentee ballot by completing and submitting:
(1) the State Board approved absentee ballot application;
(2) a form provided under federal law;
(3) subject to subsection (b) of this section, a written request that includes:
(i) the voter’s name, residence address, and signature; [and]
(II) IF THE VOTER IS REQUESTING A BALLOT FOR A PRIMARY
ELECTION AND THE VOTER IS UNAFFILIATED WITH A POLITICAL PARTY, THE
VOTER’S CHOICE OF THE BALLOT FOR UNAFFILIATED VOTERS OR THE BALLOT OF
THE POLITICAL PARTY THE VOTER WISHES TO VOTE; AND
[(ii)] (III) the address to which the ballot is to be mailed, if different
from the residence address; or
(4) the accessible online absentee ballot application provided by the State
Board.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.